Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.200

Legal services revolving fund—Recovered court costs, fees and expenses—Deposit in fund—Expenditure.

Court costs, attorneys' fees, and other expenses recovered by the attorney general shall be deposited in the legal services revolving fund and shall be considered as returned loans of materials supplied or services rendered. Such amounts may be expended in the same manner and under the same conditions and restrictions as set forth in section 11, chapter 282, Laws of 1969 ex. sess.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 71 s 6.]